Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5727
Smoke or smoking, defined.

Smoke or smoking means inhaling, exhaling, burning, or carrying any lighted or heated cigar, cigarette, pipe, hookah, or any other lighted or heated tobacco or plant product intended for inhalation, whether natural or synthetic, in any manner or in any form. The term includes the use of an electronic smoking device which creates an aerosol or vapor, in any manner or in any form.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB840, § 6.